Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2471
Power to avoid transfers.

The property liable for the payment of unsecured debts of a decedent includes all property transferred by him by any means which is in law void or voidable as against his creditors, and, subject to prior liens, the right to recover this property, so far as necessary for the payment of unsecured debts of the decedent, is exclusively in the personal representative.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 149, UPC § 3-710.